Alaska statutes. Title 44. State Government.
Article 4. Procedure for Adopting Regulations.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Department of Labor can publish its list of designated toxic and hazardous substances pursuant to AS

18.60.030

(12) and AS

18.60.105(a)

without going through the promulgation proceeding in the Administrative Procedure Act. The list is merely a compilation of chemicals and substances from sources already identified by the legislature. July 18, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 44.62.180.
Effective date.

A regulation or an order of repeal filed by the lieutenant governor becomes effective on the 30th day after the date of filing unless

otherwise specifically provided by the statute under which the regulation or order of repeal is adopted, in which event it becomes effective on the day prescribed by the statute;

it is a regulation prescribing the organization or procedure of an agency, in which event it becomes effective upon filing by the lieutenant governor or upon a later date specified by the state agency in a written instrument submitted with, or as part of, the regulation or order of repeal;

it is an emergency regulation or order of repeal adopted under AS

44.62.250

, in which case the finding and the statement of the facts constituting the emergency shall be submitted to the lieutenant governor, together with the emergency regulation or order of repeal, which, in that event only, becomes effective upon filing by the lieutenant governor or upon a later date specified by the state agency in a written instrument submitted with, or as part of, the regulation or order of repeal;

a later date is prescribed by the state agency in a written instrument submitted with, or as part of, the regulation or order of repeal.

History.

(§ 3 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 7 ch 40 SLA 1969)

Sec. 44.62.190.
Notice of proposed action.

At least 30 days before the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation, notice of the proposed action shall be

published in the newspaper of general circulation or trade or industry publication that the state agency prescribes and posted on the Alaska Online Public Notice System; in the discretion of the state agency giving the notice, the requirement of publication in a newspaper or trade or industry publication may be satisfied by using a combination of publication and broadcasting; when broadcasting the notice, an agency may use an abbreviated form of the notice if the broadcast provides the name and date of the newspaper or trade or industry journal and the Internet address of the Alaska Online Public Notice System where the full text of the notice can be found;

furnished to every person who has filed a request for notice of proposed action with the state agency;

if the agency is within a department, furnished to the commissioner of the department;

when appropriate in the judgment of the agency,

furnished to a person or group of persons whom the agency believes is interested in the proposed action; and

published in the additional form and manner the state agency prescribes;

furnished to the Department of Law together with a copy of the proposed regulation, amendment, or order of repeal for the department’s use in preparing the opinion required after adoption and before filing by AS

44.62.060

;

furnished by electronic format to all incumbent State of Alaska legislators.

If the form or manner of notice is prescribed by statute, in addition to the requirements of filing and furnishing notice under AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.300

, or in addition to the requirements of filing and mailing notice under other sections of this chapter, the notice shall be published, posted, mailed, filed, or otherwise publicized as prescribed by the statute.

The failure to furnish notice to a person as provided in this section does not invalidate an action taken by an agency under AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

.

Along with a notice furnished under (a)(2), (4)(A), or (6) of this section, the state agency, except the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, and the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, shall include

the reason for the proposed action, including, if applicable, an identification of the law, order, decision, or other action of the federal government or a federal or state court that is the basis for the proposed action; in this paragraph, “federal government” means a department, agency, corporation, or instrumentality of the United States government;

the initial cost to the state agency of implementation;

the estimated annual costs, based on a good faith effort to estimate the costs in the aggregate for each of the following categories using the information available to the state agency, to

private persons to comply with the proposed action;

the state agency for implementation and to other state agencies to comply with the proposed action; and

municipalities to comply with the proposed action;

the name of the contact person for the state agency; and

the origin of the proposed action.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, if a person who is to receive a notice under (a) of this section requests that the state agency mail the notice, the state agency shall furnish the notice to the person by mail.

To the extent feasible, the subject line of electronic mail and the title of a written publication providing the information required by (d) of this section must give the reader a fair idea of the substance of the proposed new regulation, the proposed amended regulation, or the regulation proposed for repeal.

Along with a notice furnished under (a)(2), (4)(A), or (6) of this section, the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, and the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission shall include the reason for the proposed action, the initial cost of implementation to the state agency, the estimated annual costs of implementation to the state agency, the name of a contact person, and the origin of the proposed action.

History.

(§ 5 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 149 SLA 1962; am § 1 ch 3 SLA 1968; am § 16 ch 143 SLA 1968; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 1978; am § 5 ch 1 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 201 SLA 1990; am § 6 ch 74 SLA 1991; am § 1 ch 68 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 1995; am § 4 ch 54 SLA 2000; am §§ 1, 2 ch 107 SLA 2000; am § 5 ch 164 SLA 2004; am § 13 ch 6 SLA 2012; am §§ 3, 4 ch 87 SLA 2014; am § 13 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective March 24, 2012, rewrote (a)(6), which read, “furnished by electronic format, if the state agency has the technological capability, to all incumbent State of Alaska legislators, and furnished to the Legislative Affairs Agency; if the state agency does not have the technological capability to furnish the notice by electronic format to the legislators, the state agency shall furnish the notice to the legislators by other means.”

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, rewrote (d), which read, “Along with a notice furnished under (a)(2), (4)(A), or (6) of this section, the state agency shall include the reason for the proposed action, the initial cost to the state agency of implementation, the state agency of implementation, the name of the contact person for the state agency, and the origin of the proposed action”; added (f) and (g).

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a)(6), deleted “, and furnished to the Legislative Affairs Agency;” at the end, and deleted (a)(7), which read, “(7) furnished by electronic format, along with a copy of the proposed regulation, amendment, or order of repeal, as required by AS 24.20.105(c)”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, subsections (f) and (g), and the 2014 amendments to subsection (d) apply ‘to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Where a lengthy regulation on one subject is to be proposed the best policy would be to briefly summarize the content and purpose of the regulation. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 26.

If only a very short regulation is proposed then ordinarily it would be most practicable to set forth the regulation in full. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 26.

Where a great many regulations are to be promulgated which are of a varied nature, such as fish and game regulations, or oil leasing regulations, then the only practical thing to do would be to give a general listing of the subjects to be covered, a reference to any other existing body of regulations being adopted, amended, or superseded that might be informative to the particular public or industry concerned (such as a reference to existing regulations of a state agency or department or to existing federal regulations) and a brief listing of any significant changes proposed if an existing body of regulations is to be effected.
In such case it would be well to indicate that copies of the proposed regulations can be obtained from the agency in order to indicate the agency has done everything reasonably possible to give the public affected by its regulations an opportunity to familiarize itself with the regulations and to prepare itself to submit its views at the hearing.
This should constitute substantial compliance with the Administrative Procedure Act and would serve the purpose of the act. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 26.

And when a summary of a large number of proposed regulations is to be used it would be safe for the departments and agencies of the state government to follow the Ohio and federal practice and to give notice of the areas in which regulations may or may not be promulgated by listing the subject matter to which the proposed rules would relate. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 26.

Public notice referring only to regulation numbers and subject headings. — See 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 26.

For illustrations of the notice required by this section, see 1959 Op. Att’y Gen., No. 26, Exhibits A, B, C and D.

Sec. 44.62.195.
Fiscal notes on regulations.

If the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation would require increased appropriations by the state, the department or agency affected shall prepare an estimate of the appropriation increase for the fiscal year following adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation and for at least two succeeding fiscal years.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 1980)

Sec. 44.62.200.
Contents of notice.

The notice of proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation must include

a statement of the time, place, and nature of proceedings for adoption, amendment, or repeal of the regulation;

reference to the authority under which the regulation is proposed and a reference to the particular code section or other provisions of law that are being implemented, interpreted, or made specific;

an informative summary of the proposed subject of agency action;

other matters prescribed by a statute applicable to the specific agency or to the specific regulation or class of regulations;

a summary of the fiscal information required to be prepared under AS

44.62.195

; and

for a regulation under AS

11.71.125

, a summary of the attorney general’s compliance with the requirements of AS

11.71.125(b)

.

A regulation that is adopted, amended, or repealed may vary in content from the summary specified in (a)(3) of this section if the subject matter of the regulation remains the same and the original notice was written so as to assure that members of the public are reasonably notified of the proposed subject of agency action in order for them to determine whether their interests could be affected by agency action on that subject.

An agency that issues a notice under this section shall ensure that the notice is prepared in a form adequate for posting on the Alaska Online Public Notice System. Unless the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation is proposed by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, or the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, a complete copy of each proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation and, if feasible and not prohibited by copyright, any document or other material incorporated by reference, including any document or other material incorporated by reference under this section, in the proposed adoption or amendment shall be made available on the Alaska Online Public Notice System by providing an electronic attachment or link to the complete text.

When a state agency, other than the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, or the Board of Game, posts, furnishes, or otherwise provides a notice of the proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under AS

44.62.190

, a brief description of the changes made by the proposed adoption, amendment, or repeal must accompany the notice. However, if, under AS

44.62.190(a)

, the notice is published in a newspaper or trade or industry publication or is broadcast, this subsection does not require that the brief description otherwise required by this subsection accompany the publication or the broadcast. To the extent practicable, the brief description shall be written in clear, easily readable language that a person without a legal background is able to understand.

History.

(§ 6 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 185 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 16 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 59 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 54 SLA 2000; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 2012; am §§ 5, 6 ch 87 SLA 2014; am § 22 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (d).

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, in (c), added the second sentence and made a stylistic change; in (d), deleted the last sentence, which read, “Notwithstanding AS

44.62.300

, an action may not be brought for failure of the brief description to comply with the requirements of this subsection relating to the description of the changes or its clarity and readability.”

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, added (a)(6), and made a related change.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, the 2014 amendments to subsections (c) and (d) apply “to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.”

Sec. 44.62.210.
Public proceedings.

On the date and at the time and place designated in the notice the agency shall give each interested person or the person’s authorized representative, or both, the opportunity to present statements, arguments, or contentions in writing, with or without opportunity to present them orally. The state agency may accept material presented by any form of communication authorized by this chapter and shall consider all factual, substantive, and other relevant matter presented to it before adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation. When considering the factual, substantive, and other relevant matter, the agency shall pay special attention to the cost to private persons of the proposed regulatory action.

At a hearing under this section the agency or its authorized representative may administer oaths or affirmations, and may continue or postpone the hearing to the time and place which it determines.

History.

(§ 7 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 64 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Difference between hearings under this section and AS

44.62.450

and distinction between “adjudicative facts” and “legislative facts.”
See 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

This article sets forth the procedure that must be followed when an agency exercises its quasi-legislative power but does not apply to quasi-judicial proceedings. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Article 8 of this chapter was intended to be applicable to quasi-judicial proceedings. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 7.

Sec. 44.62.213.
Agency contact with the public.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, while an agency is developing a regulatory action and before the agency provides a notice of proposed action under AS

44.62.190

, the agency may contact a person about the development of the regulatory action, and the agency may answer a question from a person that is relevant to the development of the regulatory action. In this subsection, “regulatory action” means the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, after an agency provides a notice of proposed action under AS

44.62.190

, the agency shall make a good faith effort to answer, before the end of the public comment period, a question that is relevant to the proposed action, if the question is received in writing or asked at a public meeting at least 10 days before the end of the public comment period. If a question is received after the 10-day cutoff date, the agency may answer the question. When an agency answers a question under this section, the agency shall answer the question in writing and make the question and answer available to the public. An agency may satisfy the requirements of this section by posting answers to frequently asked questions about the proposed action on the Alaska Online Public Notice System and may aggregate substantially similar questions and agency responses and provide a single consolidated response to substantially similar questions.

In this section, “agency” does not include the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, or the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission.

History.

(§ 7 ch 87 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 7, ch. 87, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, is effective October 14, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, this section applies “to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.”

Sec. 44.62.215.
Record of public comment.

In the drafting, review, or other preparation of a proposed regulation, amendment, or order of repeal, an agency, other than the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, the office of victims’ rights, and the office of the ombudsman, shall keep a record of its use or rejection of factual or other substantive information that is received in writing or orally as public comment and that is relevant to the accuracy, coverage, or other aspect of the proposed regulatory action.

History.

(§ 6 ch 64 SLA 1995; am § 29 ch 92 SLA 2001; am § 8 ch 87 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective October 14, 2014, substituted “the Regulatory Commission of Alaska, the Board of Fisheries, the Board of Game, the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission” for “a board or commission” following “an agency, other than”, and “information that is received in writing or orally as public comment” for “information that is submitted in writing as public comment”.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, the 2014 amendments to this section apply “to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.”

Sec. 44.62.218.
Regulations affecting small businesses. [Repealed, § 2 ch 91 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 44.62.220.
Right to petition.

Unless the right to petition for adoption of a regulation is restricted by statute to a designated group or the procedure for the petition is prescribed by statute, an interested person may petition an agency for the adoption or repeal of a regulation as provided in AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

.
The petition must state clearly and concisely

the substance or nature of the regulation, amendment, or repeal requested;

the reasons for the request;

reference to the authority of the agency to take the action requested.

History.

(§ 8 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 44.62.230.
Procedure on petition.

Upon receipt of a petition requesting the adoption, amendment, or repeal of a regulation under AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

, a state agency shall, within 30 days, deny the petition in writing or schedule the matter for public hearing under AS

44.62.190

—

44.62.215

. However, if the petition is for an emergency regulation, and the agency finds that an emergency exists, the requirements of AS

44.62.040(c)

and

44.62.190

—

44.62.215

do not apply, and the agency may submit the regulation to the lieutenant governor immediately after making the finding of emergency and putting the regulation into proper form.

History.

(§ 9 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 45 SLA 1969; am § 7 ch 64 SLA 1995)

Administrative Code. —

For program administration, see 18 AAC 50, art. 2.

Sec. 44.62.240.
Limitation on retroactive action.

If a regulation adopted by an agency under this chapter is primarily legislative, the regulation has prospective effect only.
A regulation adopted under this chapter that is primarily an “interpretative regulation” has retroactive effect only if the agency adopting it has adopted no earlier inconsistent regulation and has followed no earlier course of conduct inconsistent with the regulation.
Silence or failure to follow any course of conduct is considered earlier inconsistent conduct.

History.

(§ 10 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.62.245.
Material incorporated by reference.

In adopting a regulation that incorporates a document or other material by reference, a state agency may incorporate future amended versions of the document or other material if the adopted regulation identifies or refers to the document or other material followed by the phrase “as may be amended,” the phrase “as amended from time to time,” or a similar provision and the

document consists of a regulation of another agency of the state; or

incorporation of a future amended version of the document or other material is explicitly authorized by a statute.

When the amended version of a document or other material incorporated by reference in a regulation as described in (a) of this section becomes available, the state agency shall

make the amended version of the document or other material available to the public for review; and

post on the Alaska Online Public Notice System and publish in a newspaper of general circulation or trade or industry publication or in a regularly published agency newsletter or similar printed publication, not later than 15 days after the amended version of the document or other material becomes available, a notice that describes the affected regulation, the effective date of the amended version of the document or other material, and how a copy of the amended version may be obtained or reviewed.

The state agency shall also send the notice described in (b)(2) of this section to

a person who has placed the person’s name on a distribution list kept by the agency that lists persons who want to receive the notice; the agency may allow a person to request that distribution of the notice be by electronic means and shall honor that request if appropriate means are available; and

the regulations attorney in the Department of Law.

A change in the form, format, or title in a future amended or revised version of a document or material incorporated by reference in a regulation under this section does not affect the validity of the regulation or the state agency’s ability to enforce or implement the regulation. The state agency shall notify the regulations attorney in the Department of Law if the title of the document or other material changes. The regulations attorney shall correct the title in the Alaska Administrative Code under AS

44.62.125

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 119 SLA 1998; am § 6 ch 54 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 87 SLA 2014; am § 14 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, deleted (c)(3), which read, “the members of the Administrative Regulation Review Committee”, and made related changes.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 12, ch. 87, SLA 2014, the 2014 amendments to this section apply “to proposed regulations first published under AS

44.62.190

on or after October 14, 2014.”

Sec. 44.62.250.
Emergency regulations.

Except for a regulation adopted under AS

11.71.125

, a regulation or order of repeal may be adopted as an emergency regulation or order of repeal if a state agency makes a written finding, including a statement of the facts that constitute the emergency, that the adoption of the regulation or order of repeal is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. The requirements of AS

44.62.040(c)

,

44.62.060

, and

44.62.190

—

44.62.215

do not apply to the initial adoption of emergency regulations; however, upon adoption of an emergency regulation , the adopting agency shall immediately submit a copy of it to the lieutenant governor for filing and for publication in the Alaska Administrative Register, and , within five days after filing by the lieutenant governor , the agency shall give notice of the adoption in accordance with AS

44.62.190(a)

. Failure to give the required notice by the end of the 10th day automatically repeals the regulation.

A regulation or order of repeal may be adopted as an emergency regulation under AS

11.71.125

if the attorney general makes a written finding that the requirements of AS

11.71.125

are met. The requirements of AS

44.62.190

—

44.62.215

do not apply to the adoption or order of repeal by the attorney general of a regulation to schedule a substance by emergency regulation under AS 11.71.125.

History.

(§ 2(2) art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 1969; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1972; am § 123 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 45 SLA 1991; am § 8 ch 64 SLA 1995; am §§ 23, 24 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, in (a), substituted “Except for a regulation adopted under AS

11.71.125

, a regulation or order” for “A regulation or order” at the beginning; added (b).

Sec. 44.62.260.
Limitation on effective period of emergency regulations.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a regulation adopted as an emergency regulation does not remain in effect more than 120 days unless the adopting agency complies with AS

44.62.040(c)

,

44.62.060

, and

44.62.190

—

44.62.215

either before submitting the regulation to the lieutenant governor or during the 120-day period.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, before the expiration of the 120-day period, the agency shall transmit to the lieutenant governor for filing a certification that AS

44.62.040(c)

,

44.62.060

, and

44.62.190

—

44.62.215

were complied with before submitting the regulation to the lieutenant governor, or that the agency complied with those sections within the 120-day period. Failure to so certify repeals the emergency regulation; it may not be renewed or refiled as an emergency regulation.

A substance scheduled by the attorney general by emergency regulation under AS

11.71.125

will remain on the schedule under the emergency regulation for a period not to exceed 1,095 days unless the legislature schedules the substance by law or annuls the regulation by law.

History.

(§ 4 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 3 ch 45 SLA 1969; am § 9 ch 64 SLA 1995; am §§ 25, 26 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, in (a), substituted “Except as provided in (c) of this section, a regulation” for “A regulation” at the beginning; in (b), substituted “Except as provided in (c) of this section, before the expiration” for “Before the expiration” at the beginning; added (c).

Sec. 44.62.270.
State policy.

It is the state policy that emergencies are held to a minimum and are rarely found to exist. Nothing in this section limits the attorney general from scheduling a substance by emergency regulation under AS

11.71.125

.

History.

(§ 2(2) art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 27 ch 22 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 12, 2018, added the second sentence.

Sec. 44.62.280.
Purpose of AS 44.62.180 — 44.62.290.

It is the purpose of AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

to establish basic minimum procedural requirements for the adoption, amendment, or repeal of administrative regulations.
Except as provided in AS

44.62.250

, AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

apply to the exercise of quasi-legislative power conferred by a statute, but nothing in AS 44.62.180 — 44.62.290 repeals or diminishes additional requirements imposed by the statute.
AS 44.62.180 — 44.62.290 are not superseded or modified by subsequent legislation except to the extent that the legislation does so expressly.

History.

(§ 1 art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959)

Sec. 44.62.290.
Limits of the application of AS 44.62.180 — 44.62.290.

AS

44.62.180

—

44.62.290

do not apply to a regulation not required to be submitted to the lieutenant governor under AS

44.62.010

—

44.62.319

.

Only this section and AS

44.62.180

apply to a regulation that prescribes the organization or procedure of an agency.

History.

(§ 2(1) art IV (ch 1) ch 143 SLA 1959; am § 17 ch 143 SLA 1968; am § 8 ch 40 SLA 1969; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 1969; am § 15 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (a)(1), substituted “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.319

” for “AS

44.62.010

–

44.62.320

”.

Collateral references. —

2 Am. Jur. 2d, Administrative Law, § 221.